Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 9. Alaska Native Language Preservation and Advisory Council.

Sec. 44.33.520.
Alaska Native Language Preservation and Advisory Council.

The Alaska Native Language Preservation and Advisory Council is established in the department for the purpose of recommending the establishment or reorganization of programs to support the preservation, restoration, and revitalization of Alaska Native languages.

The council established under this section shall

advise both the governor and legislature on programs, policies, and projects to provide for the cost-effective preservation, restoration, and revitalization of Alaska Native languages in the state;

meet at least twice a year to carry out the purposes of the council; members may participate in meetings telephonically; and

prepare reports of its findings and recommendations for the governor’s and the legislature’s consideration on or before January 1 of each even-numbered year.

The governor shall appoint to the council established in this section five voting members who are professional language experts and who represent diverse regions of the state. In addition, one member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate and one member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives shall serve on the council as nonvoting members. In appointing the nonvoting members of the council, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint a member of the bush caucus, if a bush caucus exists. In this subsection, “bush caucus” means a group of legislators that represents rural areas of the state.

The members appointed by the governor shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses as provided under AS

39.20.180

.

The department shall provide staff as needed to support the council; the staff must demonstrate competency in an Alaska Native language.

History.

(§ 2 ch 48 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings relating to the enactment of this section and provisions related to the initial report, see §§ 1 and 3, ch. 48, SLA 2012, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Secs. 44.33.700 — 44.33.735.
Alaska Tourism Marketing Council. [Repealed, § 10 ch 29 SLA 1999.]